District of Columbia statutes.
47-3919

Rulemaking authority.

The Mayor shall issue rules to carry out the provisions of this act in accordance with § 2-505.

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 23, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3919.

Prior Codifications

“This act,” referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 8-26, which is primarily codified as § 47-3901 et seq.

References in Text